District of Columbia statutes.
1-1325

Party walls.

Whenever, on such admeasurement, the wall of a house previously erected by any proprietor shall appear to stand on the adjoining lot of any other person in part less than 7 inches in width thereon, such wall shall be considered as standing altogether on the land of such proprietor, who shall pay to the owner of the lot on which the wall may stand a reasonable price for the ground so occupied, to be decided by arbitrators or a jury, as the parties interested may agree.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1425, ch. 854, § 1586
This section is referenced in § 1-1326.
1981 Ed., § 1-925.
1973 Ed., § 1-625.